src/morphology/affixes/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON BOREALA  !!= * __@CODE@__ AKTIIVA without comparatives
 +A:%> ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;

LEXICON SPANSKA !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A:skka%> ATTR ;
 +A:s'ka%> GOAHTI-OBLadj ;
 +A+Sg+Nom:s'ka%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:s'ka%> Px3V ;
 +A+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth: R ;
 +A+Ess:n K ;


LEXICON ALLAT !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A:a%> ATTR ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom:i%>X4t K ;
 +A+Comp+Attr:i%>X4t K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu K ;
! +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:i%>X4b K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu K ;
! +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:i%>X4b K ;
 +A+Comp+Pl+Nom:i%>X4but K ;
 +A+Comp+Ess:i%>X4bun K ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4buš%> ATTRCONT ; 
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:i»X4bužž%> K ;
! +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Cmp/SgNom+Use/-Spell:i»X4bužž%> R ;			! test this  L2
! +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Cmp/SgGen:i»X4bužž%> R ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4bužža%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
 +A+Comp:i%>X4bu MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ad%>eappo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv+Err/Orth:ad%>eabbo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv+Err/Orth:ad%>eabbu%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ag%>eappo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ad%>abbo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ag%>abbo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:i%>X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:i%>X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:i%>X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:i%>X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:i%>X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:i%>X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:i%>X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:i%>X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:i%>X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:i%>X4busa%> PxV ;
 +A+Comp+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:i%>X4buiddá%> Px1V ;
 +A+Superl+Attr:i%>X4mus K ;
 +A+Superl+Sg+Nom:i%>X4muss%> K ;
! +A+Superl+Cmp/SgNom+Use/-Spell:i%>X4muss%> R ;			! test this  L2
 +A+Superl+Cmp/SgGen:i%>X4muss%> R ;
 +A+Superl+Ess:i%>X4mussa%>n K ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ad%>epmos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ag%>epmos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ad%>amos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ag%>amos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:i%>X4mussa%> PxV ;
 +A+Superl+Ess+Err/Orth:i%>X4mussa%>n%> PxC ;
 +A+Superl:i%>X4mussa%> EABBUCASE2 ;
 +A:ad ALLAGA ;
 +A+Use/NG:ag ALLAGA ;
 +A:ad%> ADVC ;
 +A+Use/NG:ag%> ADVC ;
 +A+Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:i%>X4musat K ;
 +A+Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:i%>X4but K ;


LEXICON ALLAGA !!= * __@CODE@__
 00:%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ; !^B^ doesn't work ...
 :%> MALLASadj- ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
! +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-Spell:»X7# NAMAT ;    ! Removing the #, it prevents these forms  L2
! +Cmp/SgNom#+Use/-Spell:»X7# NAMAT ;  ! from being let through lookup2cg.





!! !!Contracted adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON FIINNIS  !!= * __@CODE@__  ,-dná-(:Ø)#fiinna
 +A:a%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ; ! 
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Ess+Err/Orth:án K ; ! 
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:á%>Y5s MALLASadj- ;
 +A+Err/Orth:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 


 LEXICON DEAHTIS  !!= * __@CODE@__  as fiinnis, but with StrGr in Attr
 +A:%>a ATTR ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ;  ! 
 +A+Err/Orth:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:á%>Y5s MALLASadj- ;

LEXICON SMAVIS  !!= * __@CODE@__  as deahtis, but with even more Attr forms
 +A+Comp:i%>X4b BUStem ; ! smávit
 +A+Superl:i%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; ! smávimus
 +A:ás%> ADVC ;
 +A:%>a ATTR ;
 +A+Use/NG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ;  ! 
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Use/NG:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:á%>Y5s MALLASadj- ;
 +A+Err/Orth:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 

LEXICON STUORIS  !!= * __@CODE@__  As fiinnis, but with different comparation
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:a%>X4 ATTR ; ! 
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:á%>Y5t K ;
 +A+Comp+Dial/%-KJ:i%>X4b BUStem ; ! stuorit 
 +A+Comp+Dial/%-GG:á%>X4b BUStem ; ! stuorát 
 +A+Superl+Dial/%-KJ:i%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; ! stuorimus  
 +A+Superl+Dial/%-GG:á%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; ! stuorámus 
 +A:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;

LEXICON NJALGGAT !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A:a%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:ah%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ;  ! 
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ; ! 
 +A:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Err/Orth:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 
 +A+Ess+Err/Orth:án K ; ! 

LEXICON CAPPIS !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A:a%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Dial/%-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ;  ! 
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +A:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Err/Orth:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 


LEXICON VIISSIS   !!= * __@CODE@__  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -es/-is
 +A+Dial/%-GG:es%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:is%>X4 ATTR ; ! 
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Comp+Dial/%-KJ:át SHORTCOMP ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ; ! 
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;  ! 
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ; ! 
 +A+Dial/%-GG:á%>Y5s MALLASadj- ; ! 
 +A+Err/Orth:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 
 
LEXICON RAHPIS   !!= * __@CODE@__  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -es
 +A:es%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Comp:át SHORTCOMP ;
 +A:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +A:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +A+Err/Orth:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  ! 

LEXICON HARVVIS   !!= * __@CODE@__  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -e
 +A:e%> ATTR ;
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
! +A+Comp:át SHORTCOMP ;
 +A:i%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;

! -------------
!! !!Special cases
! -------------

LEXICON VEARA_PO !!= * __@CODE@__
 +veara+Po:% veara%> K ;
 +veara+A+Attr:% veara%> K ;
 +veara+Po:% veara%>n K ;



LEXICON VEARA !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der3+Der/veara+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:»veara%> K ;
 +Der3+Der/veara+A+Attr+Err/Orth:»veara%> K ;
 +Der3+Der/veara+A+Sg+Ess+Err/Orth:»veara%>n K ;




!! !!Final note on the adjective sublexica
!-------------------------------------

!! todo: Rewrite the adj lexica so that the attr variation is kept separate
!! from the otherwise uniform declension.



LEXICON VUDDJI- !!= * __@CODE@__
 BOHCCOadj ;
 BOHCCUadj ;

LEXICON BOHCCOadj !!= * __@CODE@__
! +Sg+Nom+Use/-Spell: PxV ;  L2
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
! +Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell: PxV ;  L2
 +Cmp/SgGen: R ; 		! Already in LEXICON BOAZU
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
! +Sg+Acc+Use/-Spell: PxV ;   L2
! +Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:s%> PxC ; L2
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; ! !SOUTH
! +Sg+Loc+Use/-Spell:st%> PxC ;  L2
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:k K ; ! !Skániid dialect

LEXICON BOHCCUadj !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
! +Sg+Com+Use/-Spell:jn%> PxC ;  L2
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:jd R ;
! +Pl+Nom+Use/-Spell:jd%> Px1C ;  L2
! +Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:jd%> PxC ;	  L2
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
! +Pl+Acc+Use/-Spell:jd%> PxC ;  L2
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ; 
! +Pl+Ill+Use/-Spell:jdasa%> PxV ;  L2
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:js K ; ! !SOUTH
! +Pl+Loc+Use/-Spell:jn%> PxC ;  L2
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j%- ENDLEX ;  !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +Pl+Com+Use/-Spell:jd%> PxPlComC ;  L2
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:jn%> PxPlComC ;






!! !!!Adjective declension
! - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON ATTR  !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the normal lexicon for ATTR forms
+Attr:         K ;                  ! Plain attributive
+Attr:         Rreal ;
!+Attr+Use/NG+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ; ! ! Nielsen p. 212: vuottâ føiet til _nominativ_formen av adjektiver  L2
! -:#%- ProperNoun ;   !Already i LEXICON R   !^C^
!+Cmp/Attr+Use/-Spell:» NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj     ! Added #, and removed # again.  L2
! #+Use/-Spell:»# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj     ! Added #, and removed # again.
+Cmp/Attr#+Use/Circ:»# ALIT ; ! both comp and independent adj ! 

LEXICON ATTRCONT  !!= * __@CODE@__  This lexicon is for forms with non-sub Attr, where we sub the rest.
 +Attr:%> K ;  ! Comp are also Attr.
 +Err/Orth: Rreal ;    
! +Err/Orth+Use/-Spell:» NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj, not compound  L2
! #+Err/Orth+Use/-Spell:»# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj
 #+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:»# ALIT ;  ! both comp and independent adj
