src/morphology/stems/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective
eahpevissis+v2+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Dial/%-GG+CmpN/First:eahpe#vis's VIISSIS ;
LEXICON Adjective
administratiiva:administratij'va BOREALA ;
allat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:all ALLAT ;
alternatiiva:alternatij'va BOREALA ;
antisipatiiva:antisipatij'va BOREALA ;
audiovisuála:audio#visu^ála BOREALA ;
automatiiva:automatij'va BOREALA ;
bilaterála:bilaterála BOREALA ;
boreála:bore^ála BOREALA ;
cirkumpolára:cirkum9#polára BOREALA ;
deahtis:deahtt DEAHTIS ;
definihtta:definihtta BOREALA ;
demonstratiiva:demonstratij'va BOREALA ;
deskriptiiva:de^skriptij'va BOREALA ;
diagonála:di^agonála BOREALA ;
digitála:digitála BOREALA ;
dubitatiiva:dubitatij'va BOREALA ;
dupleaksa:du^pleak'sa BOREALA ;
eksponentiála:eksponenti^ála BOREALA ;
federála:federála BOREALA ;
figuratiiva:figuratij'va BOREALA ;
fiinnis:fijdn FIINNIS "fine A" ;
finála:finála BOREALA ;
friskkis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fris'k DEAHTIS ;
fysikála:fysikála BOREALA ;
gassat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gass ALLAT ;
generatiiva:generatij'va BOREALA ;
geosentrála:geo#sentrála BOREALA ;
globála:globála BOREALA ;
govdat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gov'd ALLAT ;
gáldoprojektionála:gáldo#projektionála BOREALA ;
gárvvis+Err/Sub:gár'v HARVVIS ; !Sub?
hypera:hypera BOREALA ;
ideála:ide^ála BOREALA ;
immaneanta:immanean'ta BOREALA ;
implikationála:im^plikationála BOREALA ;
induktiiva:induktij'va BOREALA ;
infinihta:infinihta BOREALA ;
koloniála+CmpN/First:koloni^ála BOREALA ;
intentionála:intentionála BOREALA ;
internationála:inter#nationála BOREALA ;
intertekstuála:inter#tekstu^ála BOREALA ;
intrusiiva:in^trusij'va BOREALA ;
jáfofiinnis:jáfo7#fijdn FIINNIS ;
kollegiála:kollegi^ála BOREALA ;
komiska+Use/LexSub:komiska BOREALA; !
kommunála:kommunála BOREALA ;
konsekutiiva:konsekutij'va BOREALA ;
konseptuála:konseptu^ála BOREALA ;
konstitutionealla:konstitutioneal'la BOREALA ;
kontinentála:kontinentála BOREALA ;
koreferentiála:koreferenti^ála BOREALA ;
kursiiva:kursij'va BOREALA ;
kvantitatiiva:kvantitatij'va BOREALA ;
laestadiána+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:laestadi^ána BOREALA; !
legála:legála BOREALA ;
lutherána+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lutherána BOREALA; !
mearreprojektionála:mearre#projektionála BOREALA ;
meksikána+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:meksikána BOREALA; !
modála:modál BOREALA ; 
multilaterála:multi#laterála  BOREALA ;
nationála:nationála BOREALA ;
nationála+Err/Sub:našunála BOREALA ;
neahtis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:neahtt DEAHTIS ;
njálggat:njál'g NJALGGAT "sweet A" ;
njálggis:njál'g CAPPIS ;
normatiiva:normatij'va BOREALA ;
observationála:observationála BOREALA ;
olu+CmpN/None:olu BOREALA ;
oránša+Err/Sub:oranša BOREALA; !
pakistána+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/LexSub:pakistána BOREALA; ! !
katastrofála:kata^strofála BOREALA ;
potentiála:potenti^ála BOREALA ;
primára:primára BOREALA ;
beallepriváhta+v2+Use/NG:bealle#priváhtta BOREALA ;
prosentuála:prosentu^ála BOREALA ;
punktuála:punktu^ála BOREALA ;
refleksiiva:refleksij'va BOREALA ;
relationála:relationála BOREALA ;
rikkis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rigg VIISSIS ;
guollerikkis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guolle#rigg VIISSIS ;
dáhpáhusrikkis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dáhpáhus#rigg VIISSIS ;
ruošša-ortodoksa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruošša-ortodoksa BOREALA; !
ráhpis:ráhpp RAHPIS ;
hárvvis:hár'v HARVVIS ;
sekventiála:sekventi^ála BOREALA ;
siviila+Err/Sub:siviila BOREALA ;
smávis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:smávv SMAVIS ;
spánska+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:spán SPANSKA ;
ránska+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:rán SPANSKA ;
fránska+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:frán SPANSKA ;
dánska+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dán SPANSKA ;
sroaŋggis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sroaŋ'g DEAHTIS ;
stroaŋggis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stroaŋ'g DEAHTIS ;
stuoris+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stuorr STUORIS ;
subtraktiiva:sub^traktij'va BOREALA ;
super-čáppat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:super-čább NJALGGAT ;
sátnerikkis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sátne#rigg VIISSIS ;
teahtis:teahtt DEAHTIS ;
territoriála:territori^ála BOREALA ;
tuiska+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/-Spell:tujs'ka BOREALA ;
ultravioleahtta:ultra^vi^oleahtta BOREALA ;
viiddis:vij'd VIISSIS ;
viissis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vij's VIISSIS ;
vissis+v2+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Dial/%-GG:vis's VIISSIS ;
vuostefápmoadversatiiva:vuoste#fápmo#adversatij'va BOREALA ;
árrat+A:árrad ALLAGA ;
čoaskkis:čoas'k DEAHTIS ;
čáppat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čább NJALGGAT ;
čáppis:čább CAPPIS "beautiful A" ;
